Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.06
Child support; withholding of earnings; court order.

The court shall enter an order as allowed by section 42-364.01 at the hearing on the application for such order, if it finds that it has jurisdiction of the employer and the earnings of the parent-employee, that the parent-employee is an employee as defined in section 42-364.11 of the employer, and that the parent-employee has not complied in full with the previous order of the court requiring such parent-employee to pay for the support of a minor child. Noncompliance with a child support order shall not be found if the child support payments are automatically withheld from the paycheck if (1) any delinquency or arrearage is solely caused by a disparity between the schedule of the regular pay dates and the scheduled date the child support is due, (2) the total amount of child support to be withheld from the paychecks and the amount ordered by the support order are the same on an annual basis, and (3) the automatic deductions for child support are continuous and occurring. Nothing shall prohibit the court from continuing the order to withhold and transmit after the parent-employee has become current on the court-ordered obligation to pay child support. In fixing the amount to be withheld by the employer from the parent-employee's nonexempt, disposable earnings, the court shall determine that amount of earnings which, if paid over a reasonable period, would satisfy in full the child support arrearage existing as of the time of the hearing and would satisfy each child support obligation to come due in the future as such came due and would satisfy over a reasonable period of time the attorney's fee awarded, if any, pursuant to section 42-364.07. The court shall set flat amounts to be withheld, or, if the parent-employee's pay varies substantially from pay period to pay period, it may set a percentage of the nonexempt, disposable earnings to be withheld.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 11;

Laws 1983, LB 371, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 18, § 2.